Tennessee, session 114, HB0178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Success Sequence Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1301, is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
"Success sequence" means a method by which a person completes the following
in the following sequence:
(A) Obtains a high school diploma or high school equivalency credential;
(B) Enters into the workforce or pursues a postsecondary degree or
credential;
(C) Enters into marriage; and
(D) Has children;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1304(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(15) Provide instruction and evidence regarding the positive personal and
societal outcomes associated with the success sequence.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter.
- 2 - 001271